Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF787.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216B.1691, subdivision 2g, is amended to read: Subd. 2g. Carbon-free standard. In addition to the requirements under subdivisions 2a and 2f, deleted text begin eachdeleted text end new text begin to the extent annew text end electric utility deleted text begin must generate or procure sufficientdeleted text end new text begin generates or procuresnew text end electricity deleted text begin generateddeleted text end from a deleted text begin carbon-free energy technology to provide the electric utility's retail customers in Minnesota, or the retail customers of a distribution utility to which the electric utility provides wholesale electric service, so thatdeleted text end new text begin generation source within Minnesota,new text end the electric utility deleted text begin generates or procuresdeleted text end new text begin must generate or procurenew text end an amount of electricity from carbon-free energy technologies that is equivalent to at least the following standard percentages of the electric utility's total deleted text begin retail electric sales to retail customers indeleted text end new text begin generation or procurement from sources withinnew text end Minnesota by the end of the year indicated: (1) 2030 80 percent for public utilities; 60 percent for other electric utilities (2) 2035 90 percent for all electric utilities (3) 2040 100 percent for all electric utilities. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end